District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.37

Alternative sanctions.

(a)

A provider may employ lesser sanctions as alternatives to the transfer, suspension, or termination of services authorized in §§ 4-754.34 through 4-754.36.

(b)

Any alternative sanction applied shall be authorized in the schedule of sanctions included in the provider’s Program Rules and may include loss of special privileges and imposition of additional responsibilities.

History

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 23, 52 DCR 8113